src/fst/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
!! Pronouns
!  --------
!! Pronouns in the Purubora language are words that may replace nouns or refer to participants in the conversation.

LEXICON Pronouns
pronoun    Cases   ;
õt+Pron+Pers+Sg1:õt # "I/eu" ;
ʼẽt+v1+Pron+Pers+Sg2:ʼẽt # "you/você|tu" ;
ʼẽt+v2+Pron+Pers+Sg2:ẽt # "you/você" ;
ʼet+Pron+Pers+Sg3:ʼet # "he|she/ele|ela" ;
det+Pron+Pers+Pl2:det "vocês" ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
